firefox-addon/dictionaries/tr.dic
adaklamak/≑
adımlamak/≑
aharlamak/≑
ahırlamak/≑
aklamak/≑
akçalamak/≑
alacalamak/≑
alazlamak/≑
algılamak/≑
allamak/≑
alçılamak/≑
alıntılamak/≑
ambalajlamak/≑
amonyaklamak/≑
anlamak/≑
anıklamak/≑
apazlamak/≑
aralamak/≑
argaçlamak/≑
artdamak/≑
arıklamak/≑
arşınlamak/≑
astarlamak/≑
atkılamak/≑
avlamak/≑
ayalamak/≑
ayazlamak/≑
aylamak/≑
ayrımsamak/≑
ayıklamak/≑
azarlamak/≑
açkılamak/≑
açımlamak/≑
ağaçlamak/≑
ağnamak/≑
ağılamak/≑
ağırsamak/≑
aşağılamak/≑
aşlamak/≑
badanalamak/≑
balkımak/≑
balyalamak/≑
bangırdamak/≑
bantlamak/≑
basamaklamak/≑
basınçlamak/≑
bayatlamak/≑
bağdalamak/≑
bağlamak/≑
bağıtlamak/≑
bağışıklamak/≑
başlamak/≑
bocalamak/≑
bombalamak/≑
boyalamak/≑
boğazlamak/≑
buzağılamak/≑
bıngıldamak/≑
camlamak/≑
cavlamak/≑
cazırdamak/≑
cilalamak/≑
contalamak/≑
cumbalamak/≑
cımbızlamak/≑
cırmalamak/≑
cırtlamak/≑
cıvatalamak/≑
cıvımak/≑
cıyırdamak/≑
cızıldamak/≑
dalamak/≑
damgalamak/≑
dangıldamak/≑
dayaklamak/≑
dazlamak/≑
dosyalamak/≑
duldalamak/≑
duraklamak/≑
duralamak/≑
duşaklamak/≑
dışalımlamak/≑
dışlamak/≑
emaylamak/≑
farımak/≑
ferahlamak/≑
formatlamak/≑
fotoğraflamak/≑
fıkırdamak/≑
fırtlamak/≑
fırınlamak/≑
fıslamak/≑
fısıldamak/≑
fışkılamak/≑
fışıldamak/≑
gacırdamak/≑
gaklamak/≑
gazlamak/≑
gıcırdamak/≑
gıdıklamak/≑
gırtlaklamak/≑
hacamatlamak/≑
haklamak/≑
hamlamak/≑
harcamak/≑
harlamak/≑
harıldamak/≑
hatıllamak/≑
havlamak/≑
haydamak/≑
hazırlamak/≑
haşlamak/≑
haşırdamak/≑
hizalamak/≑
hırpalamak/≑
hışlamak/≑
hışırdamak/≑
ihtiyarlamak/≑
imzalamak/≑
ispatlamak/≑
kaballamak/≑
kakalamak/≑
kakırdamak/≑
kalaylamak/≑
kalıplamak/≑
kamçılamak/≑
kancalamak/≑
kanlamak/≑
kanıksamak/≑
kanıtsamak/≑
kaplamak/≑
karalamak/≑
kararlamak/≑
kargılamak/≑
kargışlamak/≑
karıklamak/≑
karınlamak/≑
karşılamak/≑
kasalamak/≑
kastarlamak/≑
katlamak/≑
katıklamak/≑
kavlamak/≑
kavzamak/≑
kaynamak/≑
kayıtlamak/≑
kazıklamak/≑
kaçamak/≑≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
kağşamak/≑
kaşlamak/≑
kaşımak/≑
kirizmalamak/≑
kolalamak/≑
kolonyalamak/≑
kopyalamak/≑
korkalamak/≑
koşamlamak/≑
kulaçlamak/≑
kurcalamak/≑
kâğıtlamak/≑
kılağılamak/≑
kılıçlamak/≑
kınalamak/≑
kınlamak/≑
kıpırdamak/≑
kırklamak/≑
kıskaçlamak/≑
kısıtlamak/≑
kıtırdamak/≑
kıyaslamak/≑
kızaklamak/≑
kışkışlamak/≑
laflamak/≑
limanlamak/≑
lığlamak/≑
madımak/≑≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
makaslamak/≑
malaklamak/≑
mamak/≑≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
mantarlamak/≑
marnlamak/≑
mayalamak/≑
maşalamak/≑
montajlamak/≑
muştalamak/≑
mıknatıslamak/≑
mırlamak/≑
mızımak/≑
nakışlamak/≑
nikâhlamak/≑
noktalamak/≑
numaralamak/≑
okkalamak/≑
oranlamak/≑
orkestralamak/≑
ortalamak/≑
ovalamak/≑
oyulgalamak/≑
pahlamak/≑
palazlamak/≑
paralamak/≑
parmaklamak/≑
parıldamak/≑
pataklamak/≑
patırdamak/≑
paylamak/≑
perdahlamak/≑
piyazlamak/≑
planyalamak/≑
ponzalamak/≑
poyrazlamak/≑
puanlamak/≑
pırlamak/≑
pırtlamak/≑
pıtırdamak/≑
rahatlamak/≑
rampalamak/≑
rastlamak/≑
sabahlamak/≑
saklamak/≑
salgılamak/≑
sallamak/≑
salçalamak/≑
sandıklamak/≑
sanrılamak/≑
saptamak/≑
sarkaçlamak/≑
sarsalamak/≑
sasımak/≑
savatlamak/≑
savsaklamak/≑
sayfalamak/≑
saylamak/≑
sayıklamak/≑
sayımlamak/≑
saçmalamak/≑
sağlamlamak/≑
sertifikalamak/≑
sigortalamak/≑
silikatlamak/≑
sopalamak/≑
sıfırlamak/≑
sımak/≑
sınıflamak/≑
sıralamak/≑
sırtlamak/≑
sırımak/≑
sıvamak/≑
sızlamak/≑
sığamak/≑
tabaklamak/≑
talanlamak/≑
tamamlamak/≑
tangırdamak/≑
tanıklamak/≑
tanımak/≑
tanıtlamak/≑
tapanlamak/≑
tapırdamak/≑
taraklamak/≑
tarazlamak/≑
tartaklamak/≑
tasarımlamak/≑
tasımlamak/≑
tavsamak/≑
taşlamak/≑
tekrarlamak/≑
teraslamak/≑
tokmaklamak/≑
topraklamak/≑
turfalamak/≑
tıkamak/≑
tımarlamak/≑
tıpalamak/≑
tırkazlamak/≑
tırpanlamak/≑
ufalamak/≑
uğralamak/≑
vidalamak/≑
vınlamak/≑
vızıldamak/≑
yadsımak/≑
yakalamak/≑
yalanlamak/≑
yamalamak/≑
yanlışlamak/≑
yanıtlamak/≑
yargılamak/≑
yarımlamak/≑
yassılamak/≑
yaylamak/≑
yayınlamak/≑
yaşamak/≑
yuhalamak/≑
yıkamak/≑
yıpramak/≑
zangırdamak/≑
zıhlamak/≑
zıngırdamak/≑
zırvalamak/≑
çalkalamak/≑
çapalamak/≑
çarşaflamak/≑
çayırlamak/≑
çelikçomak/≑
çıdamak/≑
çıngırdamak/≑
çıtlamak/≑
ıhlamak/≑
ılımak/≑
ırgalamak/≑
ıslamak/≑
ışıklamak/≑
ışınlamak/≑
şakırdamak/≑
şangırdamak/≑
şartlamak/≑
şişmanlamak/≑
şırlamak/≑
